Utah statutes.
58-37e-10.   Contribution among and recovery from multiple defendants.
A person subject to liability under this chapter has a right of action for
contribution against another person subject to liability under this chapter.
Contribution may be enforced either in the original action or by a separate
action brought for that purpose.  A plaintiff may seek recovery in accordance
with this chapter and existing law against a person whom a defendant has
asserted a right of contribution.
